Utah statutes.
26-39-602.   Offering or providing care in violation of chapter -- Misdemeanor.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Title 26, Chapter 23, Enforcement Provisions and Penalties, a person who provides or offers child care except as provided by this chapter is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

